Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska51-217
Public library; use by school districts.

Any school district may in its discretion at its annual meeting, by a majority vote, authorize the school board to contract for the use of a public library by the inhabitants of such district.

Laws 1911, c. 73, § 11, p. 317;

R.S.1913, § 3802;

C.S.1922, § 3195;

C.S.1929, § 51-211;

R.S.1943, § 51-217.